Missouri, session 2026, SB1257.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 307.179, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 307.179,
to read as follows:
307.179. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Child booster seat", a seating system which meets
the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards set forth in 49
C.F.R. 571.213, as amended, that is designed to elevate a
child to properly sit in a federally approved safety belt
system;
(2) "Child passenger restraint system", a seating
system which meets the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R. 571.213, as amended, and
which is either permanently affixed to a motor vehicle or is
affixed to such vehicle by a safety belt or a universal
attachment system;
(3) "Driver", a person who is in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle.
2. Every driver transporting a child under the age of
sixteen years shall be responsible, when transporting such
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1257 2
child in a motor vehicle operated by that driver on the
streets or highways of this state, for providing for the
protection of such child as follows:
(1) Children shall be secured in a rear-facing child
passenger restraint system until the child reaches two years
of age, except that a child under two years of age may be
secured in a forward-facing system when the child reaches
the highest rear-facing weight or height allowed by the
manufacturer of the particular car safety seat;
(2) Children less than four years of age, regardless
of weight, shall be secured in a child passenger restraint
system appropriate for that child;
[(2)] (3) Children weighing less than forty pounds,
regardless of age, shall be secured in a child passenger
restraint system appropriate for that child;
[(3)] (4) Children at least four years of age but less
than eight years of age[,]; who also weigh at least forty
pounds but less than eighty pounds[,]; and who are also less
than four feet, nine inches tall[,]; shall be secured in a
child passenger restraint system or booster seat appropriate
for that child;
[(4)] (5) Children at least eighty pounds [or children
more than]; at least four feet, nine inches in height; or at
least eight years of age shall be secured by a vehicle
safety belt [or booster seat appropriate for that child]
according to section 307.178; and
[(5)] (6) A child who otherwise would be required to
be secured in a booster seat may be transported in the back
seat of a motor vehicle while wearing only a lap belt if the
back seat of the motor vehicle is not equipped with a
combination lap and shoulder belt for booster seat
installation[;

SB 1257 3
(6) When transporting children in the immediate family
when there are more children than there are seating
positions in the enclosed area of a motor vehicle, the
children who are not able to be restrained by a child safety
restraint device appropriate for the child shall sit in the
area behind the front seat of the motor vehicle unless the
motor vehicle is designed only for a front seat area. The
driver transporting children referred to in this subsection
is not in violation of this section].
This subsection shall only apply to the use of a child
passenger restraint system or vehicle safety belt for
children less than sixteen years of age being transported in
a motor vehicle.
3. Any driver who violates [subdivision (1), (2), or
(3) of subsection 2 of] this section is guilty of an
infraction and, upon conviction, may be punished by a fine
of not more than fifty dollars and court costs. [Any driver
who violates subdivision (4) of subsection 2 of this section
shall be subject to the penalty in subsection 6 of section
307.178. If a driver receives a citation for violating
subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of subsection 2 of this
section, the charges shall be dismissed or withdrawn if the
driver prior to or at his or her hearing provides evidence
of acquisition of a child passenger restraint system or
child booster seat which is satisfactory to the court or the
party responsible for prosecuting the driver's citation.]
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
any public carrier for hire. The provisions of this section
shall not apply to students four years of age or older who
are passengers on a school bus designed for carrying eleven
passengers or more and which is manufactured or equipped

SB 1257 4
pursuant to Missouri Minimum Standards for School Buses as
school buses are defined in section 301.010.
5. The highways and transportation commission shall
initiate and develop a program of public information to
develop understanding of, and ensure compliance with, the
provisions of this section.
✓